Vermont, session 2025-2026, S187.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2 V.S.A. § 24 is added to read:
§ 24. MEMBERS OF GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AUTHORIZATION TO
CARRY CONCEALED HANDGUNS IN STATE HOUSE
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule, a member of the
General Assembly may carry a concealed handgun in the State House or on the
State House grounds if the member has completed a firearms safety and
training class from a certified firearms instructor.
VT LEG #385258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.187
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) A member who carries a concealed handgun as authorized by this
section shall carry documentation that the member completed a firearms safety
and training class from a certified firearms instructor.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385258 v.1